Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2326
Who may make a will.

Any individual who is eighteen or more years of age or is not a minor and who is of sound mind may make a will and thereby dispose of personal and real property at and after death and prescribe, to the extent not otherwise controlled or limited by this code, the manner of administration of his estate and conduct of his affairs after death and until final settlement of his estate.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 48, UPC § 2-501.